Utah statutes.
78B-6-1302.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Claimant" means a person who files a notice.

(2)  "Guarantee" means an agreement by a claimant to pay an amount of damages:

(a)  specified by the court;

(b)  suffered as a result of the maintenance of a notice;

(c)  to a person with an interest in the real property that is the subject of the notice; and

(d)  if the requirements of Subsection 78B-6-1304(5) are met.

(3)  "Notice" means a notice of the pendency of an action filed under Section 78B-6-1303.



Enacted by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

